California statutes. Civil Code
(2) With respect to any installment loan, nothing in this section shall preclude a borrower from becoming obligated, by an agreement in writing, to pay a prepayment charge; but only a prepayment made within five years of the date the installment loan is made may be
 subject to a prepayment charge and then solely as herein set forth. An amount not exceeding 20 percent of the original principal amount of the installment loan may be prepaid in any one 12-month period without incurring a prepayment charge. A prepayment charge may be imposed on any amount prepaid in any 12-month period in excess of 20 percent of the original principal amount of the installment loan, which charge shall not exceed an amount equal to the payment of six months’ advance interest on the amount prepaid in excess of 20 percent of the original principal amount of the installment loan.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (b):

(1) If the deed of trust or mortgage secures repayment of more than one installment loan, each of the installment loans shall be deemed to have been separately made on the date that the proceeds of the installment loan are advanced.

(2) If the outstanding balance of a loan advanced pursuant to an open-end credit plan thereafter becomes subject to an installment loan feature of the credit plan, the loan shall be deemed to have been made when the loan becomes subject to the installment loan feature, whether the feature was available at the borrower’s option under original terms of the open-end credit plan or the feature thereafter became available upon modification of the original terms of the open-end credit plan.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), no prepayment charge may be imposed with respect to an installment loan subject to this section if any of the following apply:

(1) The residential structure securing the installment loan has been damaged to such an extent by a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is declared by the Governor,
 pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that the residential structure cannot be occupied and the prepayment is causally related thereto.

(2) The prepayment is made in conjunction with a bona fide sale of the real property securing the installment loan.

(3) The lender does not comply with subdivision (e).

(4) The term of the installment loan is for not more than five years and the original principal amount of the installment loan is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(e) (1) The lender receiving a borrower’s obligation to pay a prepayment charge authorized by subdivision (b) shall furnish the borrower with a written disclosure describing the existence of the
 prepayment charge obligation, the conditions under which the prepayment charge shall be payable, and the method by which the amount of the prepayment charge shall be determined. If subdivision (f) provides the borrower with a right to rescind the installment loan and the related obligation to pay a prepayment charge, the disclosure required by this subdivision shall also inform the borrower of this right to rescind, how and when to exercise the right, and where to mail or deliver a notice of rescission.

(2) The amount of, or the method for determining the amount of, the prepayment charge for an installment loan shall be set forth in the agreement governing the open-end credit plan.

(f) (1) The disclosure required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) shall be furnished when or up to 30 days before the borrower signs the agreement or other documents required by
 the lender for the installment loan, or no earlier than 30 days before nor later than 10 days following the making of the installment loan, if made without the borrower having to sign an agreement or other documentation, such as may be the case if the installment loan may be made on the basis of telephone or other discussions between the lender and the borrower not taking place in person. If the installment loan is made before the borrower has been furnished with the disclosure required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), the borrower shall have the right to rescind the installment loan and the related obligation to pay a prepayment charge by personally delivering or mailing notice to that effect to the lender, by first-class mail with postage prepaid, at the lender’s location stated in its disclosure concerning the right to rescind within 10 days following the furnishing of the disclosure.

(2) If the disclosure required by paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (e) is included in the agreement or other document signed by the borrower for the installment loan, the disclosure shall be deemed given at that time. In other cases, the disclosure shall be deemed furnished when personally delivered to the borrower or three days after it is mailed to the borrower, first-class mail with postage prepaid, at the address to which billing statements for the open-end credit plan are being sent.

(3) The disclosure required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) may be separately furnished or may be included in the agreement or other document for the installment loan, provided that a copy of the disclosure that the borrower may retain is furnished to the borrower.

(4) If there is more than one borrower with respect to the open-end credit plan, a disclosure to any one of them pursuant to subdivision (e) shall satisfy the requirements of that
 subdivision with respect to all of them.

(g) If after an installment loan is made the lender receives the borrower’s timely notice of the rescission of the installment loan in accordance with subdivision (f), the balance of the installment loan shall be transferred to the open-end subaccount of the open-end credit plan and the borrower shall be obligated to repay the amount under the same terms and conditions, and subject to the same fees and other charges, as would be applicable had the loan initially been extended pursuant to the open-end credit plan or had the installment loan never been made.

(h) This section applies to any installment loan secured by a deed of trust or mortgage or any other lien on residential property of four units or less and Section 2954.9 does not apply to such installment loans. This section shall not apply to any loan that is subject to Section 10242.6
 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 32, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.12.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2954.7, and except when a statute, regulation, rule, or written guideline promulgated by an institutional third party applicable to notes or evidence of indebtedness secured by a deed of trust or mortgage purchased in whole or in part by an institutional third party specifically prohibits cancellation during the term of the indebtedness, the lender or servicer of a loan evidenced by a note or other evidence of indebtedness that is secured by a deed of trust or mortgage on the subject property may not charge
 or collect future payments from a borrower for private mortgage insurance or mortgage guaranty insurance as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02 of the Insurance Code, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The loan is for personal, family, household, or purchase money purposes, the subject property is owner-occupied, one-to-four unit residential real property, and the outstanding principal balance of the note or evidence of indebtedness secured by the senior deed of trust or mortgage on the subject property is equal to or less than 75 percent of the lesser of (A) if the loan was made for purchase of the property, the sales price of the property under such purchase; or (B) the appraised value of the property, as determined by the appraisal conducted in connection with the making of the loan.

(2) The borrower’s scheduled payment of monthly installments of
 principal, interest, and escrow obligations is current at the time the right to cancellation of mortgage insurance accrues.

(3) During the 12 months prior to the date upon which the right to cancellation accrues, the borrower has not been assessed more than one late penalty for any scheduled payment and has not made any scheduled payment more than 30 days late.

(4) The loan evidenced by a note or evidence of indebtedness was made or executed on or after January 1, 1998.

(5) No notice of default has been recorded against the real property pursuant to Section 2924, as a result of a nonmonetary default on the extension of credit by the borrower during the last 12 months prior to the accrual of the borrower’s right to cancellation.

(b) This section does not
 apply to any of the following:

(1) A note or evidence of indebtedness secured by a deed of trust or mortgage, or mortgage insurance, executed under the authority of Part 3 (commencing with Section 50900) or Part 4 (commencing with Section 51600) of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Any note or evidence of indebtedness secured by a deed of trust or mortgage that is funded in whole or in part pursuant to authority granted by statute, regulation, or rule that, as a condition of that funding, prohibits or limits termination of payments for private mortgage insurance or mortgage guaranty insurance during the term of the indebtedness.

(c) If the note secured by the deed of trust or mortgage will be or has been sold in whole or in part to an institutional third party, adherence to the institutional third
 party’s standards for termination of future payments for private mortgage insurance or mortgage guaranty insurance shall be deemed in compliance with the requirements of this section.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “institutional third party” means the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, the Government National Mortgage Association and other substantially similar institutions, whether public or private, provided the institutions establish and adhere to rules applicable to the right of cancellation of private mortgage insurance or mortgage guaranty insurance, which are the same or substantially the same as those utilized by the above-named institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 62, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2955.

(a) Money held by a mortgagee or a beneficiary of a deed of trust on real property in this state, or held by a vendor on a contract of sale of real property in this state, in an impound account for the payment of taxes and assessments or insurance premiums or other purposes on or relating to the property, shall be retained in this state and, if invested, shall be invested only with residents of this state in the case of individuals, or with partnerships, corporations, or other persons, or the branches or subsidiaries thereof, which are
 engaged in business within this state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a mortgagee or beneficiary of a deed of trust, secured by a first lien on real property, may deposit money held for the payment of taxes and assessments or insurance premiums or other purposes in an impound account in an out-of-state depository institution insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation if the mortgagee or beneficiary is any one of the following:

(1) The Federal National Mortgage Association, the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, the Federal Housing Administration, or the Veteran’s Administration.

(2) A bank or subsidiary thereof, bank holding company or subsidiary thereof, trust company, savings bank or savings and loan association or subsidiary thereof, savings bank
 or savings association holding company or subsidiary thereof, credit union, industrial bank or industrial loan company, commercial finance lender, personal property broker, consumer finance lender, or insurer doing business under the authority of and in accordance with the laws of this state, any other state, or of the United States relating to banks, trust companies, savings banks or savings associations, credit unions, industrial banks or industrial loan companies, commercial finance lenders, personal property brokers, consumer finance lenders, or insurers, as evidenced by a license, certificate, or charter issued by the United States or a state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States.

(3) Trustees of a pension, profit-sharing, or welfare fund, if the pension, profit-sharing, or welfare fund has a net worth of not less than fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

(4) A corporation with outstanding securities registered under Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or a wholly owned subsidiary of that corporation.

(5) A syndication or other combination of any of the entities specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, that is organized to purchase the promissory note.

(6) The California Housing Finance Agency or a local housing finance agency organized under the Health and Safety Code.

(7) A licensed real estate broker selling all or part of the loan, note, or contract to a lender or purchaser described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of this subdivision.

(8) A licensed residential mortgage lender or servicer when acting under the authority of that license.

(c) A mortgagee or beneficiary of a deed of trust who deposits funds held in trust in an out-of-state depository institution in accordance with subdivision (b) shall make available, in this state, the books, records, and files pertaining to those trust accounts to the appropriate state regulatory department or agency, or pay the reasonable expenses for travel and lodging incurred by the regulatory department or agency in order to conduct an examination at an out-of-state location.

(d) The Attorney General may bring an action on behalf of the people of California to enjoin a violation of subdivision (a) or subdivision (b).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1055, Sec. 3) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 564, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2955.1.

(a) Any lender originating a loan secured by the borrower’s separate interest in a condominium project, as defined in Section 4125 or 6542, which requires earthquake insurance or imposes a fee or any other condition in lieu thereof pursuant to an underwriting requirement imposed by an institutional third-party purchaser shall disclose all of the following to the potential borrower:

(1) That the lender or the institutional third party in question requires earthquake insurance or imposes a fee or any other condition in lieu thereof pursuant to an underwriting requirement imposed by an institutional third-party purchaser.

(2) That not all lenders or institutional third parties require earthquake insurance or impose a fee or any other condition in lieu thereof pursuant to an underwriting requirement imposed by an institutional third-party purchaser.

(3) Earthquake insurance may be required on the entire condominium project.

(4) That lenders or institutional third parties may also require that a condominium project maintain, or demonstrate an ability to maintain, financial reserves in the amount of the earthquake insurance deductible.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “institutional third party” means the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Government National Mortgage Association, and other substantially similar institutions, whether public or private.

(c) The disclosure required by this section shall be made in writing by the lender as soon as reasonably practicable.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 41) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 18.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2955.5.

(a) No lender shall require a borrower, as a condition of receiving or maintaining a loan secured by real property, to provide hazard insurance coverage against risks to the improvements on that real property in an amount exceeding the replacement value of the improvements on the property.

(b) A lender shall disclose to a borrower, in writing, the contents of subdivision (a), as soon as practicable, but before execution of any note or security
 documents. 

(c) Any person harmed by a violation of this section shall be entitled to obtain injunctive relief and may recover damages and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(d) A violation of this section does not affect the validity of the loan, note secured by a deed of trust, mortgage, or deed of trust.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Hazard insurance coverage” means insurance against losses caused by perils which are commonly covered in policies described as a “Homeowner’s Policy,” “General Property Form,” “Guaranteed Replacement Cost Insurance,” “Special Building Form,” “Standard Fire,” “Standard Fire with Extended Coverage,” “Standard Fire with Special Form Endorsement,” or comparable insurance coverage to protect the real property
 against loss or damage from fire and other perils covered within the scope of a standard extended coverage endorsement.

(2) “Improvements” means buildings or structures attached to the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 412, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 412.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disclosures on Purchase Money Liens on Residential Property [2956. - 2967.]

2956.

In a transaction for the purchase of a dwelling for not more than four families in which there is an arranger of credit, which purchase includes an extension of credit by the vendor, a written disclosure with respect to that credit transaction shall be made, as required by this article:

(a) To the purchaser, by the arranger of credit and the vendor (with respect to information within the knowledge of the vendor).

(b) To the vendor, by the arranger of credit and the purchaser (with respect to information within the knowledge
 of the purchaser).

If there is more than one arranger of credit and one of those arrangers has obtained the offer by the purchaser to purchase the property, that arranger shall make the disclosure, unless the parties designate another person in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

2957.

The following definitions shall apply for the purposes of this article:

(a) “Arranger of credit” means:

(1) A person, other than a party to the credit transaction (except as provided in paragraph (2)), who is involved in developing or negotiating credit terms, participates in the completion of the credit documents, and directly or indirectly receives compensation for arrangement of the credit or from any transaction or transfer of the real property which is facilitated by that extension of credit. As used in this
 paragraph, “arranger of credit” does not apply to an attorney who is representing one of the parties to the credit transaction.

(2) A party to the transaction who is either a real estate licensee, licensed under provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, or is an attorney licensed under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code if neither party to the transaction is represented by an agent who is a real estate licensee. In any transaction in which disclosure is required solely by the provisions of this paragraph, the obligations of this article shall apply only to a real estate licensee or attorney who is a party to the transaction, and not to any other party.

(3) An arranger of credit does not include a person acting in the capacity as an escrow in the transaction.

(4) Persons described in paragraph (2) who are acting in the capacity as an escrowholder in the transaction shall nevertheless be deemed arrangers of credit where such persons act on behalf of a party to the transaction or an agent of such party in the development or negotiation of credit terms. Neither the completion of credit documents in accordance with instructions of a party or his or her agent nor the furnishing of information regarding credit terms to a party or his or her agent shall be considered to be the development or negotiation of credit terms.

(b) “Balloon payment note” means a note which provides for a final payment as originally scheduled which is more than twice the amount of any of the immediately preceding six regularly scheduled payments or which contains a call provision; provided, however, that if the call provision is not exercised by the holder of the note,
 the existence of the unexercised call provision shall not cause the note to be deemed to be a balloon payment note.

(c) “Call provision” means a note contract term that provides the holder of the note with the right to call the note due and payable either after a specified period has elapsed following closing or after a specified date.

(d) “Credit” means the right granted by a vendor to a purchaser to purchase property and to defer payment therefore.

The credit involved must be subject to a finance charge or payable by written agreement in more than four installments, whether providing for payment of principal and interest, or interest only, not including a downpayment.

(e) “Credit documents” are those documents which contain the binding credit terms, and include a note or a
 contract of sale if the contract spells out terms upon which a vendor agrees to provide financing for a purchaser.

(f) “Purchase” includes acquisition of equitable title by a real property sales contract as defined in Section 2985, or lease with an option to purchase, where the facts demonstrate intent to transfer equitable title.

(g) “Security documents” include a mortgage, deed of trust, real property sales contract as defined in Section 2985, or lease with an option to purchase, where the facts demonstrate an intent to transfer equitable title.

(h) “All inclusive trust deed” is an instrument which secures indebtedness owed by the trustor to the beneficiary, which indebtedness includes a debt or debts owed by that beneficiary to the beneficiary of another security document secured by the same property which is
 senior in priority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1360, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2958.

A disclosure is not required under this article, to a purchaser when that purchaser is entitled to receive, a disclosure pursuant to the Federal Truth-In-Lending Act (15 U.S. Code 1604, as amended), the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act (12 U.S. Code 2601, as amended), or Section 10240 of the Business and Professions Code; or to a vendor if the vendor is entitled to receive, a disclosure pursuant to Sections 10232.4 and 10232.5 of the Business and Professions Code, or disclosure pursuant to a qualification under Section 25110 of the Corporations Code or disclosure pursuant to regulations of the Department of Corporations granting an exemption from
 Section 25110 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

2959.

The disclosures required by this article shall be made as soon as practicable, but before execution of any note or security documents. If any disclosure is made after the execution of credit documents by the purchaser, such documents shall be contingent on the purchaser’s approval of the disclosures prior to execution of the security documents. The disclosure statement shall be receipted for by the purchaser and the vendor. The disclosure shall be signed by the arranger of credit and a copy shall be delivered respectively to the purchaser and the vendor and the arranger shall retain a true copy of the executed statements for three years.

The provisions of this section do not apply to the disclosures required by Section 2966.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

2960.

If information disclosed in accordance with this article is subsequently rendered inaccurate as a result of any act, occurrence, or agreement between the parties to the transaction subsequent to the delivery of the required disclosures, the inaccuracy resulting therefrom shall not constitute a violation of this article. If, at the time disclosure is to be made, an item of information required to be disclosed is unknown or not available to the vendor, purchaser, or arranger of credit, and the arranger of credit has made a reasonable effort to ascertain it, the disclosure may employ an approximation of the information, provided the approximation is
 clearly identified as such, is reasonable, is based on the best information available to the arranger, and is not used for the purpose of circumventing or evading the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

2961.

Every disclosure required by this article and every act which is to be performed in making that disclosure shall be made in good faith. For the purposes of this article, “good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

2962.

Any disclosure made pursuant to this article may be amended in writing by the person making the disclosure, provided that any amendment shall be subject to the provisions of Section 2959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

2963.

The disclosures required to both purchaser and vendor by this article are:

(a) An identification of the note or other credit documents or security documents and of the property which is the security for the transaction.

(b) A description of the terms of the promissory note or other credit documents or a copy of the note or other credit documents.

(c) Insofar as available, the principal terms and conditions of each recorded encumbrance which constitutes a lien
 upon the property which is or will be senior to the financing being arranged, including the original balance, the current balance, the periodic payment, any balloon payment, the interest rate (and any provisions with respect to variations in the interest rate), the maturity date, and whether or not there is any current default in payment on that encumbrance. 

(d) A warning that, if refinancing would be required as a result of lack of full amortization under the terms of any existing or proposed loans, such refinancing might be difficult or impossible in the conventional mortgage marketplace. 

(e) If negative amortization is possible as a result of any variable or adjustable rate financing being arranged, a clear disclosure of this fact and an explanation of its potential effect.

(f) In the event that the financing
 involves an all inclusive trust deed, the disclosure shall indicate whether the credit or security documents specify who is liable for payment or responsible for defense in the case of an attempted acceleration by a lender or other obligee under a prior encumbrance, and whether or not the credit or security documents specify the responsibilities and rights of the parties in the event of a loan prepayment respecting a prior encumbrance which may result in a requirement for refinancing, a prepayment penalty, or a prepayment discount and, if such specification occurs, a recital of the provisions which apply.

(g) If the financing being arranged or any of the financing represented by a prior encumbrance could result in a balloon payment, or in a right in the lender or other obligee under such financing to require a prepayment of the principal balance at or after a stipulated date, or upon the occurrence of a stipulated event, a disclosure of the
 date and amount of any balloon payment or the amount which would be due upon the exercise of such right by the lender or obligee, and a statement that there is no assurance that new financing or loan extension will be available at the time of such occurrence.

(h) If the financing being arranged involves an all inclusive trust deed or real property sales contract, a disclosure of the party to whom payments will be made and who will be responsible for remitting these funds to payees under prior encumbrances and vendors under this transaction and a warning that, if that person is not a neutral third party, the parties may wish to agree to have a neutral third party designated for these purposes.

(i) A disclosure on the identity, occupation, employment, income, and credit data about the prospective purchaser, as represented to the arranger by the prospective purchaser; or,
 specifically, that no representation as to the credit-worthiness of the specific prospective purchaser is made by the arranger. A warning should also be expressed that Section 580b of the Code of Civil Procedure may limit any recovery by the vendor to the net proceeds of the sale of the security property in the event of foreclosure.

(j) A statement that loss payee clauses have been added to property insurance protecting the vendor, or that instructions have been or will be directed to the escrowholder, if any, in the transaction or the appropriate insurance carriers for addition of such loss payee clauses, or a statement that, if such provisions have not been made, that the vendor should consider protecting himself or herself by securing such clauses.

(k) A statement that a request for notice of default under Section 2924b has been recorded, or that, if it has not been recorded,
 the vendor should consider recording a request for notice of default.

(l) That a policy of title insurance has been obtained or will be obtained and be furnished to the vendor and purchaser, insuring the respective interests of the vendor and purchaser, or that the vendor and purchaser individually should consider obtaining a policy of title insurance.

(m) That a tax service has been arranged to report to the vendor whether property taxes have been paid on the property, and who will be responsible for the continued retention and compensation of tax service; or that the vendor should otherwise assure for himself or herself that the taxes on the property have been paid.

(n) A disclosure whether the security documents on the financing being arranged have been or will be recorded pursuant to Section 27280 of the
 Government Code, or a statement that the security of the vendor may be subject to intervening liens or judgments which may occur after the note is executed and before any resort to security occurs if the security documents are not recorded.

(o) If the purchaser is to receive any cash from the proceeds of the transaction, a statement of that fact, the amount, the source of the funds, and the purpose of the disbursement as represented by the purchaser.

(p) A statement that a request for notice of delinquency under Section 2924e has been made, or that, if it has not been made, the vendor should consider making a request for a notice of delinquency.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1331) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 788, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2964.

The specification of items for disclosure in this article does not limit or abridge any obligation for disclosure created by any other provision of law or which may exist in order to avoid fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

2965.

The validity of any credit document or of any security document subject to the provisions of this article shall not be invalidated solely because of the failure of any person to comply with this article. However, any person who willfully violates any provision of this article shall be liable in the amount of actual damages suffered by the vendor or purchaser as the proximate result of the violation.

No person may be held liable in any action under this article if it is shown by a preponderance of the evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the
 maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid any such error.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

2966.

(a) In a transaction regulated by this article, which includes a balloon payment note when the term for repayment is for a period in excess of one year, the holder of the note shall, not less than 90 nor more than 150 days before the balloon payment is due, deliver or mail by first-class mail, with a certificate of mailing obtained from the United States Postal Service, to the trustor, or his or her successor in interest, at the last known address of such person a written notice, to include:

(1) A statement of the name and address of the person to whom the balloon
 payment is required to be paid.

(2) The date on or before which the balloon payment was or is required to be paid.

(3) The amount of the balloon payment, or if its exact amount is unknown a good faith estimate of the amount thereof, including unpaid principal, interest, and any other charges (assuming payment in full of all scheduled installments coming due between the date of the notice and the date when the balloon payment is due).

(4) A description of the trustor’s right, if any, to refinance the balloon payment, including a summary of the actual terms of the refinancing or an estimate or approximation thereof, to the extent known.

If the due date of the balloon payment of a note subject to this subdivision is extended prior to the time notice is otherwise required under
 this subdivision, this notice requirement shall apply only to the due date as extended (or as subsequently extended).

(b) Failure to provide notice as required by subdivision (a) does not extinguish any obligation of payment by the trustor, except that the due date for any balloon payment shall be the date specified in the note, or 90 days from the date the delivery or mailing of the notice, or the date specified in the notice, whichever date is later. If the operation of this section acts to extend the term of any such note, interest shall continue to accrue for the extended term at the contract rate and payments shall continue to be due at any periodic interval and on any scheduled payment schedule specified in the note and shall be credited to principal or interest under terms of the note. Default in any extended periodic payment shall be considered a default under terms of the note or security instrument.

(c) Any failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall not affect the validity of a sale in favor of a bona fide purchaser or the rights of an encumbrancer for value and without notice.

(d) Every note subject to the provisions of this section shall include the following statement:

“This note is subject to Section 2966 of the Civil Code, which provides that the holder of this note shall give written notice to the trustor, or his successor in interest, of prescribed information at least 90 and not more than 150 days before any balloon payment is due.”

Failure to include this notice shall not invalidate the note.

(e) The provisions of this section shall apply to any note executed on or after July 1, 1983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1360, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2967.

Any action arising under this article may be brought within two years from the date on which the liability arises, except that where any material disclosure under this article has been materially and willfully misrepresented, the action may be brought within two years of discovery of the misrepresentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. State of Emergency [2968. - 2968.]

2968.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Mortgage servicer” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2920.5.

(2) “Property” means residential real property that is improved by four or fewer residential dwelling units, affixed mobilehomes, and manufactured homes.

(3) “State of emergency” and “local emergency” have the same meanings as defined in subdivisions (b) and (c), respectively, of Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(b) A
 transferor mortgage servicer servicing a mortgage secured by property within the geographic limits of a proclaimed state of emergency or local emergency shall deliver to a transferee mortgage servicer any material written records between the borrower and the mortgage servicer relating to the borrower’s election to use insurance proceeds to repair or replace property damaged by a disaster for which the state of emergency or local emergency was proclaimed.

(c) A transferee mortgage servicer pursuant to subdivision (b) shall
 not dishonor a previous written agreement to repair property made prior to the transfer between the transferor mortgage servicer and the borrower and approved by the owner of the promissory note.

(d) This article shall not be interpreted to prohibit a mortgage servicer from delivering to a transferee mortgage servicer any material written records relating to a borrower’s election to use insurance proceeds to repair or replace damaged property that was not caused by a disaster for which a state of emergency or local emergency was proclaimed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 873, Sec. 1.   (SB 455)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2a. Home Equity Loan Disclosure Act [2970. - 2971.]

2970.

For purposes of this chapter “home equity loan” means any open end consumer credit plan in which a consensual security interest is created or retained against the consumer’s dwelling.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1315, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2971.

(a) At the time that a customer makes an initial application to a creditor for a home equity loan in person, or within three business days if the customer applies by mail or telephone, the creditor shall provide the applicant with a disclosure in either of the following forms:

(1) The statement: “This home equity loan that you are applying for will be secured by your home and your failure to repay the loan for any reason could cause you to lose your home!”

(2) A statement to the effect that a home equity
loan is secured by a lien against the home of the consumer and in the event of any default the consumer risks the loss of the home.

(b) The disclosure required in subdivision (a) shall be made by either of the following means:

(1) A separate and specific document attached to or accompanying the application.

(2) A clear and conspicuous statement on the application.

(c) If a creditor is required by federal statute or regulation to make a substantially similar disclosure to that required by subdivision (a), and the creditor complies with that federal statute or regulation, the creditor shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1315, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------


